North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Admission of Members.

§ 55A-6-01.
Members.

A corporation may have one or more classes of members or may have no members.

No person shall be admitted as a member without the person’s consent.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Whether or not a corporation will have members must be stated in its articles of incorporation as required by G.S. 55A-2-02(a)(5). If it does have members, their rights and obligations must be defined pursuant to

G.S. 55A-6-20

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Nonprofit Corporation in North Carolina: Recognizing a Right to Member Derivative Suits,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 999 (1985).

§§ 55A-6-02 through 55A-6-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.